Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.290

Transfer of property by city, county, or other municipal corporation—Emergency grant or loan of funds by city.

(1) Any city within or comprising any metropolitan park district may turn over to the park district any lands that it may own, or any street, avenue, or public place within the city for playground, park, or other purposes authorized for such district, and thereafter its control and management must vest in the board of park commissioners. However, the police regulations of such city apply to all such premises.

(2) At any time that any such metropolitan park district is unable, through lack of sufficient funds, to provide for the continuous operation, maintenance and improvement of the parks and playgrounds and other properties or facilities owned by it or under its control, and the legislative body of any city within or comprising such metropolitan park district must determine that an emergency exists requiring the financial aid of such city to be extended in order to provide for such continuous operation, maintenance and/or improvement of parks, playgrounds facilities, other properties, and programs of such park district within its limits, such city may grant or loan to such metropolitan park district such of its available funds, or such funds that it may lawfully procure and make available, as it finds necessary to provide for such continuous operation and maintenance and, pursuant thereto, any such city and the board of park commissioners of such district are authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement embodying such terms and conditions of any such grant or loan as may be mutually agreed upon.

(3) The board of metropolitan park commissioners may accept public streets of the city and grounds for public purposes when donated for park, playground, boulevard, and other park purposes authorized for such district.

(4) Counties, cities, and other municipal corporations, including but not limited to park and recreation districts operating under chapter 36.69 RCW, may enter into agreements with metropolitan park districts to transfer to one another, with or without consideration therefor, any lands, facilities, equipment, other interests in real or personal property, or interests under contracts, leases, or similar agreements. The board of metropolitan park commissioners may accept and may make, for metropolitan park district purposes, such transfers of lands, facilities, equipment, other interests in real or personal property, and interests under contracts, leases, or similar agreements.

[ 2017 c 215 s 5; 2005 c 226 s 1; 1985 c 416 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.290. Prior: 1953 c 194 s 1. Formerly: (i) 1943 c 264 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-18; prior: 1907 c 98 s 16; RRS s 6735. (ii) 1943 c 264 s 19; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-19; prior: 1907 c 98 s 19; RRS s 6738.]

NOTES:

Application—2005 c 226: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply retroactively to metropolitan park district elections occurring on or after May 1, 2004." [ 2005 c 226 s 4.]

Effective date—2005 c 226: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 28, 2005]." [ 2005 c 226 s 5.]